apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_det_pr_prn.ca.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="iso-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
  </sdefs>


 <pardefs>
<!--Paradigmes de números i signes puntuació -->
<pardef n="guionet">
    
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
    
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



 <pardef n="a__pr">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



<pardef n="/a__pr"> <!--MG: Inclou contracció amb articles. -->
  <e r="LR"> 
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
       <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>     
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>als</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>   
        <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>als<b/>meus</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>al<b/>meu</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
 
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>als<b/>teus</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>al<b/>teu</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>als<b/>seus</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>al<b/>seu</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>als<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>al<b/>nostre</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>als<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>al<b/>vostre</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>als<b/>meus</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>al<b/>meu</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>  
     
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>als<b/>teus</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>al<b/>teu</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   
     
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>als<b/>seus</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>al<b/>seu</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   
          
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>als<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>al<b/>nostre</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>   
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>als<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>al<b/>vostre</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

</pardef>

<e lm="amb"><i>amb</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a"><par n="/a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="cap a"><i>cap<b/></i><par n="/a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="com ara"><i>com<b/>ara</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="com a"><i>com<b/></i><par n="/a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="com"><i>com</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="contra"><i>contra</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="damunt"><i>damunt</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="davant"><i>davant</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="dins"><i>dins</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="durant"><i>durant</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="en"><i>en</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="entre"><i>entre</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="excepte"><i>excepte</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="fins a"><i>fins<b/></i><par n="/a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="fins"><i>fins</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="fora"><i>fora</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="incloent-hi"><i>incloent-hi</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="malgrat"><i>malgrat</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="menys"><i>menys</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="més"><i>més</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="per a"><i>per<b/></i><par n="/a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="per tot" r="RL"><i>per<b/>tot</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="segons"><i>segons</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sense"><i>sense</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sobre"><i>sobre</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sota"><i>sota</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="via"><i>via</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
   <e>
        <par n="guionet"/>
      </e>
